Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-2,130
Sections; how construed.

Nothing in sections 46-2,120 to 46-2,129 shall be construed to limit or restrict the powers of the Chief Water Officer with respect to adjudication of water rights.

Laws 1995, LB 99, § 11;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 159;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 143.